Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Somali American Youth Enrichment Club (SAYEC) to support the youth sports program and parent education program. Money may be used for direct training, support services, and economic support for individuals experiencing barriers to employment. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end